Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.230

Appeal.

(1) An appeal may be taken under this chapter from:

(a) An order denying a motion to compel arbitration;

(b) An order granting a motion to stay arbitration;

(c) An order confirming or denying confirmation of an award;

(d) An order correcting an award;

(e) An order vacating an award without directing a rehearing; or

(f) A final judgment.

(2) An appeal under this section may be taken as from an order or a judgment in a civil action.

[ 2023 c 61 s 24.]